Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $4,511,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the Minnesota youth program. This appropriation is available either year of the biennium and is added to the base for this purpose. new text end